Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-216
Village; dissolution; petition or resolution; election.

(1) Whenever a petition for submission of the question of the abolishment of incorporation to the registered voters of any village, signed by not less than one-third of the registered voters of the village, is filed in the office of the county clerk or election commissioner of the county in which such village is situated, the county clerk or election commissioner shall cause such question to be submitted to the registered voters of the village as provided in this section and give notice thereof in the general notice of the election at which the question will be submitted.

(2) Whenever two-thirds of the members of the village board of trustees, by resolution following a public hearing, vote to submit the question of the abolishment of the incorporation of the village, the resolution shall be filed in the office of the county clerk or election commissioner of the county in which such village is situated and the county clerk or election commissioner shall cause such question to be submitted to the registered voters of the village as provided in this section and give notice thereof in the general notice of the election at which the question will be submitted.

(3) If a petition or resolution is filed with the county clerk or election commissioner, the county clerk or election commissioner shall cause such question to be submitted to the registered voters of the village at the next primary or general election which is scheduled to be held more than seventy days after the date upon which the petition or resolution is filed. If the petition or resolution calls for a vote on the question at a special election to be called for that purpose, the county clerk or election commissioner shall cause a special election to be called for the purpose of placing the question before the registered voters and the election shall be called not sooner than sixty days nor later than seventy days after the date of the filing of the petition or resolution. If a petition is filed at any time other than within one hundred eighty days prior to a primary or general election and the petition does not call for the question to be considered at a special election, the village board of trustees may, by majority vote, call for the county clerk or election commissioner to cause the matter to be placed upon the ballot at a special election on a date certain specified by the board, except that such date shall not be sooner than sixty days after the date upon which the petition was filed.

(4) If the question of abolishment of incorporation is submitted to the voters and such question receives a favorable vote by a majority of those voting on the issue, the village board of trustees shall file with the Secretary of State a certified statement showing the total votes for and against such measure.

Laws 1885, c. 17, § 2, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 5066;

C.S.1922, § 4238;

C.S.1929, § 17-216;

R.S.1943, § 17-216;

Laws 1973, LB 559, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 1346, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 80.